GRAMMARS/ITALIAN/FST2/src/italian.lexc
LEXICON V07	V07A; V07B; V07C; V07D; V07E; V07F; V07G; 
		V07H; V07I; V07L; V07M; V07N;


!===============================================================================
!VERB : CLASSE 8   (chiudere)
!radice/i: chiud/chius
!
!TEMPO     COD         1          2          3          4         5          6
!
!ind_pre   a           o          i          e       iamo       ete        ono 
!ind_imp   b         evo        evi        eva      evamo     evate      evano
!pas_rem   c           i       esti          e       emmo      este        ero
!futuro    d        ero`       erai       era`      eremo     erete     eranno
!con_pre   e           a          a         a        iamo      iate        ano 
!con_imp   f        essi       essi      esse      essimo      este     essero
!condiz    g        erei     eresti    erebbe      eremmo    ereste   erebbero
!part_pre  h        ente       enti
!part_pas  i           o (a,i,e)
!gerundio  l        endo
!infinito  m         ere
!imperat   n                      i          a       iamo       ete        ano

LEXICON V08A1	0:o		V00A1;
LEXICON V08A2	0:i		V00A2;
LEXICON V08A3	0:e		V00A3;
LEXICON V08A4	0:iamo		V00A4;
LEXICON V08A5	0:ete		V00A5;
LEXICON V08A6	0:ono		V00A6;
LEXICON V08A	V08A1; V08A2; V08A3; V08A4; V08A5; V08A6;

LEXICON V08B1	0:evo		V00B1;
LEXICON V08B2	0:evi		V00B2;
LEXICON V08B3	0:eva		V00B3;
LEXICON V08B4	0:evamo		V00B4;
LEXICON V08B5	0:evate		V00B5;
LEXICON V08B6	0:evano		V00B6;
LEXICON V08B	V08B1; V08B2; V08B3; V08B4; V08B5; V08B6;

LEXICON V08C1	0:i		V00C1;
LEXICON V08C2	0:esti		V00C2;
LEXICON V08C3	0:e		V00C3;
LEXICON V08C4	0:emmo		V00C4;
LEXICON V08C5	0:este		V00C5;
LEXICON V08C6	0:ero		V00C6;
LEXICON V08C	V08C1; V08C2; V08C3; V08C4; V08C5; V08C6;

LEXICON V08D1	0:erò		V00D1;
LEXICON V08D2	0:erai		V00D2;
LEXICON V08D3	0:erà		V00D3;
LEXICON V08D4	0:eremo		V00D4;
LEXICON V08D5	0:erete		V00D5;
LEXICON V08D6	0:eranno		V00D6;
LEXICON V08D	V08D1; V08D2; V08D3; V08D4; V08D5; V08D6;

LEXICON V08E1	0:a		V00E1;
LEXICON V08E2	0:a		V00E2;
LEXICON V08E3	0:a		V00E3;
LEXICON V08E4	0:iamo		V00E4;
LEXICON V08E5	0:iate		V00E5;
LEXICON V08E6	0:ano		V00E6;
LEXICON V08E	V08E1; V08E2; V08E3; V08E4; V08E5; V08E6;

LEXICON V08F1	0:essi		V00F1;
LEXICON V08F2	0:essi		V00F2;
LEXICON V08F3	0:esse		V00F3;
LEXICON V08F4	0:essimo	V00F4;
LEXICON V08F5	0:este		V00F5;
LEXICON V08F6	0:essero	V00F6;
LEXICON V08F	V08F1; V08F2; V08F3; V08F4; V08F5; V08F6;

LEXICON V08G1	0:erei		V00G1;
LEXICON V08G2	0:eresti	V00G2;
LEXICON V08G3	0:erebbe	V00G3;
LEXICON V08G4	0:eremmo	V00G4;
LEXICON V08G5	0:ereste	V00G5;
LEXICON V08G6	0:erebbero	V00G6;
LEXICON V08G	V08G1; V08G2; V08G3; V08G4; V08G5; V08G6;

LEXICON V08H	0:ent		V00H;
LEXICON V08I	0		V00I;	
LEXICON V08L	0:endo		V00L;	
LEXICON V08M	0:ere		V00M;
	
LEXICON V08N2	0:i		V00N2;
LEXICON V08N3	0:a		V00N3;
LEXICON V08N4	0:iamo		V00N4;
LEXICON V08N5	0:ete		V00N5;
LEXICON V08N6	0:ano		V00N6;
LEXICON V08N	V08N2; V08N3; V08N4; V08N5; V08N6;

LEXICON V08	V08A; V08B; V08C; V08D; V08E; V08F; V08G; 
		V08H; V08I; V08L; V08M; V08N;

!===============================================================================
!VERB : CLASSE 9   (unire)             
!radice/i: un
!
!TEMPO     COD         1          2          3          4         5          6
!
!ind_pre   a        isco       isci       isce       iamo       ite     iscono 
!ind_imp   b         ivo        ivi        iva      ivamo     ivate      ivano
!pas_rem   c          ii       isti         i`       immo      iste      irono
!futuro    d        iro`       irai       ira`      iremo     irete     iranno
!con_pre   e        isca       isca      isca        iamo      iate     iscano 
!con_imp   f        issi       issi      isse      issimo      iste     issero
!condiz    g        irei     iresti    irebbe      iremmo    ireste   irebbero
!part_pre  h        ente       enti
!part_pas  i         ito (ita,iti,ite)
!gerundio  l        endo
!infinito  m         ire
!imperat   n                   isci       isca       iamo       ite     iscano

LEXICON V09A1	0:isco		V00A1;
LEXICON V09A2	0:isci		V00A2;
LEXICON V09A3	0:isce		V00A3;
LEXICON V09A4	0:iamo		V00A4;
LEXICON V09A5	0:ite		V00A5;
LEXICON V09A6	0:iscono	V00A6;
LEXICON V09A	V09A1; V09A2; V09A3; V09A4; V09A5; V09A6;

LEXICON V09B1	0:ivo		V00B1;
LEXICON V09B2	0:ivi		V00B2;
LEXICON V09B3	0:iva		V00B3;
LEXICON V09B4	0:ivamo		V00B4;
LEXICON V09B5	0:ivate		V00B5;
LEXICON V09B6	0:ivano		V00B6;
LEXICON V09B	V09B1; V09B2; V09B3; V09B4; V09B5; V09B6;

LEXICON V09C1	0:ii		V00C1;
LEXICON V09C2	0:isti		V00C2;
LEXICON V09C3	0:ì		V00C3;
LEXICON V09C4	0:immo		V00C4;
LEXICON V09C5	0:iste		V00C5;
LEXICON V09C6	0:irono		V00C6;
LEXICON V09C	V09C1; V09C2; V09C3; V09C4; V09C5; V09C6;

LEXICON V09D1	0:irò		V00D1;
LEXICON V09D2	0:irai		V00D2;
LEXICON V09D3	0:irà		V00D3;
LEXICON V09D4	0:iremo		V00D4;
LEXICON V09D5	0:irete		V00D5;
LEXICON V09D6	0:iranno		V00D6;
LEXICON V09D	V09D1; V09D2; V09D3; V09D4; V09D5; V09D6;

LEXICON V09E1	0:isca		V00E1;
LEXICON V09E2	0:isca		V00E2;
LEXICON V09E3	0:isca		V00E3;
LEXICON V09E4	0:iamo		V00E4;
LEXICON V09E5	0:iate		V00E5;
LEXICON V09E6	0:iscano	V00E6;
LEXICON V09E	V09E1; V09E2; V09E3; V09E4; V09E5; V09E6;

LEXICON V09F1	0:issi		V00F1;
LEXICON V09F2	0:issi		V00F2;
LEXICON V09F3	0:isse		V00F3;
LEXICON V09F4	0:issimo	V00F4;
LEXICON V09F5	0:iste		V00F5;
LEXICON V09F6	0:issero	V00F6;
LEXICON V09F	V09F1; V09F2; V09F3; V09F4; V09F5; V09F6;

LEXICON V09G1	0:irei		V00G1;
LEXICON V09G2	0:iresti	V00G2;
LEXICON V09G3	0:irebbe	V00G3;
LEXICON V09G4	0:iremmo	V00G4;
LEXICON V09G5	0:ireste	V00G5;
LEXICON V09G6	0:irebbero	V00G6;
LEXICON V09G	V09G1; V09G2; V09G3; V09G4; V09G5; V09G6;

LEXICON V09H	0:ent		V00H;
LEXICON V09I	0:it		V00I;	
LEXICON V09L	0:endo		V00L;	
LEXICON V09M	0:ire		V00M;
	
LEXICON V09N2	0:isci		V00N2;
LEXICON V09N3	0:isca		V00N3;
LEXICON V09N4	0:iamo		V00N4;
LEXICON V09N5	0:ite		V00N5;
LEXICON V09N6	0:iscano	V00N6;
LEXICON V09N	V09N2; V09N3; V09N4; V09N5; V09N6;

LEXICON V09	V09A; V09B; V09C; V09D; V09E; V09F; V09G; 
		V09H; V09I; V09L; V09M; V09N;

!===============================================================================
!VERB : CLASSE 10   (essere)	ONLY 1 verb
!radice/i: er/fo/fu/ess/s/st
!
!TEMPO     COD         1          2          3          4          5          6
!
!ind_pre   a         ono         ei                  iamo       iete        ono
!ind_imp   b           o          i          a      avamo      avate        ano
!pas_rem   c           i        sti                   mmo        ste       rono
!futuro    d        aro`       arai       ara`      aremo      arete     aranno
!con_pre   e          ia         ia         ia       iamo       iate       iano
!con_imp   f         ssi        ssi        sse      ssimo        ste      ssero
!condiz    g        arei     aresti     arebbe     aremmo     areste   arebbero
!part_pre  h        ente       enti
!part_pas  i         ato (ata,ati,ate)
!gerundio  l          endo
!infinito  m         ere
!imperat   n                     ii        ia        iamo        ate       iano

LEXICON V11A1	0:io		V00A1;
LEXICON V11A2	0:i		V00A2;
LEXICON V11A3	0:ia		V00A3;
LEXICON V11A4	0:iamo		V00A4;
LEXICON V11A5	0:iate		V00A5;
LEXICON V11A6	0:iano		V00A6;
LEXICON V11A	V11A1; V11A2; V11A3; V11A4; V11A5; V11A6;

LEXICON V11B1	0:iavo		V00B1;
LEXICON V11B2	0:iavi		V00B2;
LEXICON V11B3	0:iava		V00B3;
LEXICON V11B4	0:iavamo	V00B4;
LEXICON V11B5	0:iavate	V00B5;
LEXICON V11B6	0:iavano	V00B6;
LEXICON V11B	V11B1; V11B2; V11B3; V11B4; V11B5; V11B6;

LEXICON V11C1	0:iai		V00C1;
LEXICON V11C2	0:iasti		V00C2;
LEXICON V11C3	0:iò		V00C3;
LEXICON V11C4	0:iammo		V00C4;
LEXICON V11C5	0:iaste		V00C5;
LEXICON V11C6	0:iarono	V00C6;
LEXICON V11C	V11C1; V11C2; V11C3; V11C4; V11C5; V11C6;

LEXICON V11D1	0:ierò		V00D1;
LEXICON V11D2	0:ierai		V00D2;
LEXICON V11D3	0:ierà		V00D3;
LEXICON V11D4	0:ieremo	V00D4;
LEXICON V11D5	0:ierete	V00D5;
LEXICON V11D6	0:ieranno	V00D6;
LEXICON V11D	V11D1; V11D2; V11D3; V11D4; V11D5; V11D6;

LEXICON V11E1	0:i		V00E1;
LEXICON V11E2	0:i		V00E2;

LEXICON MAIN
compire+Verb+Trans:comp	V09A;
compire+Verb+Trans:comp	V09B;
compire+Verb+Trans:comp	V09C;
compire+Verb+Trans:comp	V09D;
compire+Verb+Trans:comp	V09E;
compire+Verb+Trans:comp	V09F;
compire+Verb+Trans:comp	V09G;
compire+Verb+Trans:comp	V09M;
compire+Verb+Trans:comp	V09N;
contrarre+Verb+Trans:contra	V08A2;
contrarre+Verb+Trans:contra	V08A3;
contrarre+Verb+Trans:contra	V08A4;
contrarre+Verb+Trans:contra	V08A5;
contrarre+Verb+Trans:contra	V08N5;
corrispondere+Verb:corrispos	V08C1;
corrispondere+Verb:corrispos	V08C3;
corrispondere+Verb:corrispos	V08C6;
decorrere+Verb:decorr	V08B;
decorrere+Verb:decorr	V08C2;
decorrere+Verb:decorr	V08C4;
decorrere+Verb:decorr	V08C5;
decorrere+Verb:decorr	V08F;
decorrere+Verb:decorr	V08H;
decorrere+Verb:decorr	V08L;
deferire+Verb+Trans:defer	V09;
deridere+Verb+Trans:derid	V08D;
deridere+Verb+Trans:derid	V08G;
deridere+Verb+Trans:derid	V08M;
detergere+Verb+Trans:deterg	V08A;
detergere+Verb+Trans:deterg	V08E;
detergere+Verb+Trans:deterg	V08N;
detrarre+Verb+Trans:detragg	V08A1;
detrarre+Verb+Trans:detragg	V08A6;
detrarre+Verb+Trans:detragg	V08E1;
detrarre+Verb+Trans:detragg	V08E2;
detrarre+Verb+Trans:detragg	V08E3;
detrarre+Verb+Trans:detragg	V08E6;
detrarre+Verb+Trans:detragg	V08N3;
detrarre+Verb+Trans:detragg	V08N6;
distogliere+Verb+Trans:distogli	V08A3;
distogliere+Verb+Trans:distogli	V08A5;
distogliere+Verb+Trans:distogli	V08N5;
distogliere+Verb+Trans:distogl	V08A2;
distogliere+Verb+Trans:distogl	V08A4;
distogliere+Verb+Trans:distogl	V08E4;
distogliere+Verb+Trans:distogl	V08E5;
distogliere+Verb+Trans:distogl	V08N2;
distogliere+Verb+Trans:distogl	V08N4;
escludere+Verb+Trans:esclus	V08I;
esprimere+Verb+Trans:espress	V08C1;
esprimere+Verb+Trans:espress	V08C3;
esprimere+Verb+Trans:espress	V08C6;
fungere+Verb:fung	V08B;
fungere+Verb:fung	V08C2;
fungere+Verb:fung	V08C4;
fungere+Verb:fung	V08C5;
fungere+Verb:fung	V08F;
fungere+Verb:fung	V08H;
fungere+Verb:fung	V08L;
impaurire+Verb+Trans:impaur	V09;
indulgere+Verb:indulg	V08D;
indulgere+Verb:indulg	V08G;
indulgere+Verb:indulg	V08M;
insorgere+Verb:insorg	V08A;
insorgere+Verb:insorg	V08E;
insorgere+Verb:insorg	V08N;
nuocere+Verb:nuocci	V08A1;
nuocere+Verb:nuocci	V08A6;
nuocere+Verb:nuocci	V08E1;
nuocere+Verb:nuocci	V08E2;
nuocere+Verb:nuocci	V08E3;
nuocere+Verb:nuocci	V08E6;
nuocere+Verb:nuocci	V08N3;
nuocere+Verb:nuocci	V08N6;
parere+Verb:pa	V11A1;
parere+Verb:pa	V11A4;
raccogliere+Verb+Trans:raccogli	V08A5;
raccogliere+Verb+Trans:raccogli	V08N5;
raccogliere+Verb+Trans:raccogl	V08A4;
raccogliere+Verb+Trans:raccogl	V08E4;
raccogliere+Verb+Trans:raccogl	V08E5;
raccogliere+Verb+Trans:raccogl	V08N4;
redimere+Verb+Trans:redent	V08I;
reinserire+Verb+Trans:reinser	V09;
ricrescere+Verb:ricrebb	V08C1;
ricrescere+Verb:ricrebb	V08C6;
ridere+Verb+Trans:ris	V08C3;
rinvenire+Verb:rinveng	V08A1;
rinvenire+Verb:rinveng	V08A6;
ritrarre+Verb+Trans:ritra	V08A2;
ritrarre+Verb+Trans:ritra	V08A3;
ritrarre+Verb+Trans:ritra	V08N2;
scindere+Verb+Trans:scind	V08B;
scindere+Verb+Trans:scind	V08C2;
scindere+Verb+Trans:scind	V08C4;
scindere+Verb+Trans:scind	V08C5;
scindere+Verb+Trans:scind	V08F;
sciogliere+Verb+Trans:sciogli	V08H;
sciogliere+Verb+Trans:sciogli	V08L;
sconnettere+Verb+Trans:sconnett	V08C;
soccorrere+Verb+Trans:soccorr	V08D;
soccorrere+Verb+Trans:soccorr	V08G;
soggiungere+Verb+Trans:soggiung	V08M;
sottomettere+Verb+Trans:sottomett	V08A;
sottomettere+Verb+Trans:sottomett	V08E;
sottomettere+Verb+Trans:sottomett	V08N;
togliere+Verb+Trans:tolg	V08E1;
togliere+Verb+Trans:tolg	V08E2;
togliere+Verb+Trans:tolg	V08E3;
togliere+Verb+Trans:tolg	V08E6;
trafiggere+Verb+Trans:trafitt	V08I;
trarre+Verb+Trans:tragg	V08A1;
trarre+Verb+Trans:tragg	V08A6;
trarre+Verb+Trans:tragg	V08N3;
trarre+Verb+Trans:tragg	V08N6;
trarre+Verb+Trans:tra	V08A4;
trarre+Verb+Trans:tra	V08A5;
volere+Verb+Modal+Trans:vogl	V08E4;
volere+Verb+Modal+Trans:vogl	V08E5;
volere+Verb+Modal+Trans:vogl	V08N4;
volere+Verb+Modal+Trans:vuol	V08A3;
volere+Verb+Modal+Trans:vuo	V08A2;
volere+Verb+Trans:vuo	V08N2;
